Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.330

Correcting amendments of information in application or financial and other reports—Exception.

If the information contained in any document filed with the administrator or the administrator's designee pursuant to RCW 21.30.230 or 21.30.310, except for those documents which the administrator, by rule or order, may exclude from this requirement, is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect, the licensed person shall promptly file a correcting amendment, unless notification of the correction has been given under RCW 21.30.260(3).

[ 1986 c 14 s 34.]